Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB547.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 217.186 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "opioid antagonist" means naloxone or any other United
States Food and Drug Administration-approved drug designed to reverse the effects
of an opioid overdose.
(2) (a) A licensed health care[health-care] provider who, acting in good faith,
directly or by standing order, prescribes or dispenses an opioid antagonist to a
person or agency who, in the judgment of the health care[health-care]
provider, is capable of administering the drug for an emergency opioid
overdose, shall not, as a result of his or her acts or omissions, be subject to
disciplinary or other adverse action under KRS Chapter 311, 311A, 314, or
315 or any other professional licensing statute.
(b) As used in this subsection, "licensed health care[health-care] provider"
includes a pharmacist as defined in KRS 315.010 who holds a separate
certification issued by the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy authorizing the
initiation of the dispensing of an opioid antagonist under subsection (6) of this
section.
(3) A prescription for an opioid antagonist may include authorization for administration
of the drug to the person for whom it is prescribed by a third party, if the
prescribing instructions indicate the need for the third party, upon administering the
drug, to immediately notify a local public safety answering point of the situation
necessitating the administration.
(4) A person or agency, including a peace officer, jailer, firefighter, paramedic, or
emergency medical technician or a school employee authorized to administer
medication under KRS 156.502, may:
(a) Receive a prescription for an opioid antagonist;
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 12/19/2024 1:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 319
(b) Possess an opioid antagonist pursuant to this subsection and any equipment
needed for its administration;
(c) Administer an opioid antagonist to an individual suffering from an apparent
opioid-related overdose; and
(d) Provide, as part of a harm-reduction[harm reduction] program, an opioid
antagonist to persons who have been trained on the mechanism and
circumstances of its administration.
(5) A person acting in good faith who provides or administers an opioid antagonist
received under this section shall be immune from criminal and civil liability for the
provision or administration, unless personal injury results from the gross negligence
or willful or wanton misconduct of the person providing or administering the drug.
(6) (a) The Board of Pharmacy, in consultation with the Kentucky Board of Medical
Licensure, shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to establish certification, educational, operational, and
protocol requirements to implement this section.
(b) Administrative regulations promulgated under this subsection shall:
1. Require that any dispensing under this section be done only in
accordance with a physician-approved protocol and specify the
minimum required components of any such protocol;
2. Require education as to the mechanism and circumstances for the
administration of an opioid antagonist for the person to whom an opioid
antagonist is dispensed; and
3. Require that a record of the dispensing be made available to a physician
signing a protocol under this subsection, if desired by the physician.
(c) Administrative regulations promulgated under this subsection may include:
1. A supplemental educational or training component for a pharmacist
seeking certification under this subsection; and
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 12/19/2024 1:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 319
2. A limitation on the forms of the opioid antagonist and means of its
administration that may be dispensed pursuant to this subsection.
(7) (a) The board of each local public school district and the governing body of each
private and parochial school or school district may permit a school to keep an
opioid antagonist on the premises and regulate the administration of an opioid
antagonist to any individual suffering from an apparent opiate-related
overdose.
(b) In collaboration with local health departments, local health providers, and
local schools and school districts, the Kentucky Department for Public Health
shall develop clinical protocols to address supplies of an opioid antagonist
kept by schools under this subsection[section] and to advise on the clinical
administration of an opioid antagonist.
(8) (a) Each public postsecondary educational institution shall provide access to
opioid antagonists at convenient locations on campus in a sufficient
number to adequately serve the population of the institution. Access may be
provided through the installation of emergency opioid antagonist cabinets
that include:
1. Instructions for administration of the opioid antagonist and specific
instructions to call emergency medical services;
2. One (1) rescue breathing barrier device with gloves and alcohol; and
3. Any other information or equipment determined to be necessary by the
Kentucky Department for Public Health.
(b) In collaboration with public postsecondary educational institutions, the
Kentucky Department for Public Health shall develop best practices and
clinical protocols to address supplies of opioid antagonists to be provided on
campuses under this subsection and to advise on the clinical administration
of opioid antagonists.
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 12/19/2024 1:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 319
(c) Each public postsecondary educational institution may apply for funds from
the opioid abatement trust fund established in KRS 15.293 and any other
available funds to coordinate, maintain, and supply the opioid antagonists
required under this subsection.
(9) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a licensed health care
provider, including a pharmacist who is utilizing a protocol established by this
section, may dispense an opioid antagonist to any person or agency who, as part of
a harm-reduction[harm reduction] program, provides training to the public on the
mechanism and circumstances for the administration of an opioid antagonist,
regardless of whom the ultimate user of the opioid antagonist may be. The
documentation of the dispensing of an opioid antagonist to any person or agency
operating a harm-reduction[harm reduction] program shall satisfy any general
documentation or recording requirements found in administrative regulations
regarding legend drugs promulgated pursuant to this chapter.
Section 2. KRS 15.291 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established the Kentucky Opioid Abatement Advisory Commission.
The commission shall be attached to the Department of Law for administrative
purposes.
(2) (a) The commission shall consist of the following voting members:
1. The Attorney General or his or her designee, who shall act as chair;
2. The State Treasurer or his or her designee;
3. The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or his or
her designee;
4. One (1) member appointed by the University of Kentucky from the
HEALing Communities Study Team;
5. One (1) member appointed by the Attorney General representing victims
of the opioid crisis;
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 12/19/2024 1:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 319
6. One (1) member appointed by the Attorney General representing the
drug treatment and prevention community;
7. One (1) member appointed by the Attorney General representing law
enforcement; and
8. Two (2) citizens at large appointed by the Attorney General.
(b) The commission shall consist of the following nonvoting members who shall
serve at the pleasure of their appointing authority:
1. One (1) member appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives; and
2. One (1) member appointed by the President of the Senate.
(3) (a) Members of the commission appointed under subsection (2)(a)1. to 3. of this
section shall serve terms concurrent with holding their respective offices or
positions.
(b) The remaining members of the commission shall serve staggered two (2) year
terms as follows:
1. Members of the commission appointed under subsection (2)(a)4. to 6. of
this section shall serve an initial term of two (2) years; and
2. Members of the commission appointed under subsection (2)(a)7. to 8. of
this section shall serve an initial term of one (1) year.
(c) Members of the commission shall not receive compensation for their services
but may be reimbursed for necessary travel and lodging expenses incurred in
the performance of their duties.
(4) (a) Meetings of the commission shall be conducted according to KRS 61.800 to
61.850.
(b) The commission shall meet at least twice within each calendar year.
(c) Five (5) voting members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business.
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 12/19/2024 1:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 319
(d) Each member of the commission shall have one (1) vote, with all actions
being taken by an affirmative vote of the majority of members present.
(5) The commission shall award moneys from the opioid abatement trust fund
established in KRS 15.293 to reimburse prior expenses or to fund projects
according to the following criteria related to opioid use disorder (OUD) or any co-
occurring substance use disorder or mental health (SUD/MH) issues:
(a) Reimbursement for:
1. Any portion of the cost related to outpatient and residential treatment
services, including:
a. Services provided to incarcerated individuals;
b. Medication-assisted treatment;
c. Abstinence-based treatment; and
d. Treatment, recovery, or other services provided by community
health centers or not-for-profit providers;
2. Emergency response services provided by law enforcement or first
responders; or
3. Any portion of the cost of administering an opioid antagonist as defined
in KRS 217.186; or
(b) Provide funding for any project which:
1. Supports intervention, treatment, and recovery services provided to
persons:
a. With OUD or co-occurring SUD/MH issues; or
b. Who have experienced an opioid overdose;
2. Supports detoxification services, including:
a. Medical detoxification;
b. Referral to treatment; or
c. Connections to other services;
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 12/19/2024 1:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 319
3. Provides access to opioid-abatement-related housing, including:
a. Supportive housing; or
b. Recovery housing;
4. Provides or supports transportation to treatment or recovery programs or
services;
5. Provides employment training or educational services for persons in
treatment or recovery;
6. Creates or supports centralized call centers that provide information and
connections to appropriate services;
7. Supports crisis stabilization centers that serve as an alternative to
hospital emergency departments for persons with OUD and any co-
occurring SUD/MH issues or persons that have experienced an opioid
overdose;
8. Improves oversight of opioid treatment programs to ensure evidence-
based and evidence-informed practices;
9. Provides scholarships and support for certified addiction counselors and
other mental and behavioral health providers, including:
a. Training scholarships;
b. Fellowships;
c. Loan repayment programs; or
d. Incentives for providers to work in rural or underserved areas of
the Commonwealth;
10. Provides training on medication-assisted treatment for health care
providers, students, or other supporting professionals;
11. Supports efforts to prevent over-prescribing and ensures appropriate
prescribing and dispensing of opioids;
12. Supports enhancements or improvements consistent with state law for
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 12/19/2024 1:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 319
prescription drug monitoring programs;
13. Supports the education of law enforcement or other first responders
regarding appropriate practices and precautions when dealing with
opioids or individuals with OUD or co-occurring SUD/MH issues;
14. Supports opioid-related emergency response services provided by law
enforcement or first responders;
15. Treats mental health trauma issues resulting from the traumatic
experiences of opioid users or their family members;
16. Engages nonprofits, the faith community, and community coalitions to
support prevention and treatment, and to support family members in
their efforts to care for opioid users in their family;
17. Provides recovery services, support, and prevention services for women
who are pregnant, may become pregnant, or who are parenting with
OUD or co-occurring SUD/MH issues;
18. Trains healthcare providers that work with pregnant or parenting women
on best practices for compliances with federal requirements that children
born with Neonatal Abstinence Syndrome get referred to appropriate
services and receive a plan of care;
19. Addresses Neonatal Abstinence Syndrome, including prevention,
education, and treatment of OUD and any co-occurring SUD/MH issues;
20. Offers home-based wrap-around services to persons with OUD and any
co-occurring SUD/MH issues, including parent-skills training;
21. Supports positions and services, including supportive housing and other
residential services relating to children being removed from the home or
placed in foster care due to custodial opioid use;
22. Provides public education about opioids or opioid disposal;
23. Provides drug take-back disposal or destruction programs;
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 12/19/2024 1:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 319
24. Covers the cost of administering an opioid antagonist as defined in KRS
217.186;
25. Supports pre-trial services that connect individuals with OUD and any
co-occurring SUD/MH issues to evidence-informed treatment and
related services;
26. Supports treatment and recovery courts for persons with OUD and any
co-occurring SUD/MH issues, but only if they provide referrals to
evidence-informed treatment;
27. Provides evidence-informed treatment, recovery support, harm
reduction, or other appropriate services to individuals with OUD and
any co-occurring SUD/MH issues who are incarcerated, leaving jail or
prison, have recently left jail or prison, are on probation or parole, are
under community corrections supervision, or are in re-entry programs or
facilities;
28. Meets the criteria included in any settlement agreement or judgment
between the parties listed in KRS 15.293(3)(a);[ or]
29. Provides access to opioid antagonists on the campuses of public
postsecondary educational institutions as provided in Section 1 of this
Act; or
30. Any other project deemed appropriate for opioid-abatement purposes by
the commission.
(6) The commission may identify additional duties or responsibilities, including:
(a) Reporting on projects and programs related to addressing the opioid epidemic;
(b) Developing priorities, goals, and recommendations for spending on the
projects and programs;
(c) Working with state agencies or outside entities to develop measures for
projects and programs that address substance use disorders; or
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 12/19/2024 1:50 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 319
(d) Making recommendations for policy changes on a state or local level,
including statutory law and administrative regulations.
(7) The commission shall:
(a) Create and maintain a website[Web site] on which it shall publish its minutes,
attendance rolls, funding awards, and reports of funding by recipients; and
(b) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
to implement this section. The commission may promulgate emergency
administrative regulations to take effect immediately so that funds may be
distributed more quickly and efficiently to combat the opioid epidemic.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 12/19/2024 1:50 PM Jacketed